Resources/ta_IN.aff
# எழு class - ந்தேன்-வேன்
SFX R Y 1051
SFX R   ு     /y       .
SFX R   ு     ச்செய்/y       .
SFX R   ு     ச்செய்தேன்/y       .
SFX R   ு     ச்செய்தோம்/y       .
SFX R   ு     ச்செய்தாய்/y       .
SFX R   ு     ச்செய்தீர்/y       .
SFX R   ு     ச்செய்தீர்கள்/y       .
SFX R   ு     ச்செய்தான்/y       .
SFX R   ு     ச்செய்தாள்/y       .
SFX R   ு     ச்செய்தார்/y       .
SFX R   ு     ச்செய்தார்கள்/y       .
SFX R   ு     ச்செய்தது/y       .
SFX R   ு     ச்செய்தன/y       .
SFX R   ு     ச்செய்கிறேன்/y       .
SFX R   ு     ச்செய்கிறோம்/y       .
SFX R   ு     ச்செய்கிறாய்/y         .
SFX R   ு     ச்செய்கிறீர்/y         .
SFX R   ு     ச்செய்கிறீர்கள்/y         .
SFX R   ு     ச்செய்கிறான்/y         .
SFX R   ு     ச்செய்கிறாள்/y        .
SFX R   ு     ச்செய்கிறார்/y        .
SFX R   ு     ச்செய்கிறார்கள்/y         .
SFX R   ு     ச்செய்கிறது/y        .
SFX R   ு     ச்செய்கிறன/y       .
SFX R   ு     ச்செய்கின்றேன்/y       .
SFX R   ு     ச்செய்கின்றோம்/y       .
SFX R   ு     ச்செய்கின்றாய்/y         .
SFX R   ு     ச்செய்கின்றீர்/y         .
SFX R   ு     ச்செய்கின்றீர்கள்/y         .
SFX R   ு     ச்செய்கின்றான்/y         .
SFX R   ு     ச்செய்கின்றாள்/y        .
SFX R   ு     ச்செய்கின்றார்/y        .
SFX R   ு     ச்செய்கின்றார்கள்/y         .
SFX R   ு     ச்செய்கின்றது/y        .
SFX R   ு     ச்செய்கின்றன/y       .
SFX R   ு     ச்செய்வேன்/y       .
SFX R   ு     ச்செய்வோம்/y       .
SFX R   ு     ச்செய்வாய்/y         .
SFX R   ு     ச்செய்வீர்/y         .
SFX R   ு     ச்செய்வீர்கள்/y         .
SFX R   ு     ச்செய்வான்/y         .
SFX R   ு     ச்செய்வாள்/y        .
SFX R   ு     ச்செய்வார்/y        .
SFX R   ு     ச்செய்வார்கள்/y         .
SFX R   ு     ச்செய்யும்/y        .
SFX R   ு     வை/y       .
SFX R   ு     வைத்தேன்/y       .
SFX R   ு     வைத்தோம்/y       .
SFX R   ு     வைத்தாய்/y       .
SFX R   ு     வைத்தீர்/y       .
SFX R   ு     வைத்தீர்கள்/y       .
SFX R   ு     வைத்தான்/y       .
SFX R   ு     வைத்தாள்/y       .
SFX R   ு     வைத்தார்/y       .
SFX R   ு     வைத்தார்கள்/y       .
SFX R   ு     வைத்தது/y       .
SFX R   ு     வைத்தன/y       .
SFX R   ு     வைக்கிறேன்/y       .
SFX R   ு     வைக்கிறோம்/y       .
SFX R   ு     வைக்கிறாய்/y         .
SFX R   ு     வைக்கிறீர்/y         .
SFX R   ு     வைக்கிறீர்கள்/y         .
SFX R   ு     வைக்கிறான்/y         .
SFX R   ு     வைக்கிறாள்/y        .
SFX R   ு     வைக்கிறார்/y        .
SFX R   ு     வைக்கிறார்கள்/y         .
SFX R   ு     வைக்கிறது/y        .
SFX R   ு     வைக்கிறன/y       .
SFX R   ு     வைக்கின்றேன்/y       .
SFX R   ு     வைக்கின்றோம்/y       .
SFX R   ு     வைக்கின்றாய்/y         .
SFX R   ு     வைக்கின்றீர்/y         .
SFX R   ு     வைக்கின்றீர்கள்/y         .
SFX R   ு     வைக்கின்றான்/y         .
SFX R   ு     வைக்கின்றாள்/y        .
SFX R   ு     வைக்கின்றார்/y        .
SFX R   ு     வைக்கின்றார்கள்/y         .
SFX R   ு     வைக்கின்றது/y        .
SFX R   ு     வைக்கின்றன/y       .
SFX R   ு     வைப்பேன்/y       .
SFX R   ு     வைப்போம்/y       .
SFX R   ு     வைப்பாய்/y         .
SFX R   ு     வைப்பீர்/y         .
SFX R   ு     வைப்பீர்கள்/y         .
SFX R   ு     வைப்பான்/y         .
SFX R   ு     வைப்பாள்/y        .
SFX R   ு     வைப்பார்/y        .
SFX R   ு     வைப்பார்கள்/y         .
SFX R   ு     வைக்கும்/y        .
SFX R   ு     ப்பார்/y       .
SFX R   ு     ப்பார்த்தேன்/y       .
SFX R   ு     ப்பார்த்தோம்/y       .
SFX R   ு     ப்பார்த்தாய்/y       .
SFX R   ு     ப்பார்த்தீர்/y       .
SFX R   ு     ப்பார்த்தீர்கள்/y       .
SFX R   ு     ப்பார்த்தான்/y       .
SFX R   ு     ப்பார்த்தாள்/y       .
SFX R   ு     ப்பார்த்தார்/y       .
SFX R   ு     ப்பார்த்தார்கள்/y       .
SFX R   ு     ப்பார்த்தது/y       .
SFX R   ு     ப்பார்த்தன/y       .
SFX R   ு     ப்பார்க்கிறேன்/y       .
SFX R   ு     ப்பார்க்கிறோம்/y       .
SFX R   ு     ப்பார்க்கிறாய்/y         .
SFX R   ு     ப்பார்க்கிறீர்/y         .
SFX R   ு     ப்பார்க்கிறீர்கள்/y         .
SFX R   ு     ப்பார்க்கிறான்/y         .
SFX R   ு     ப்பார்க்கிறாள்/y        .
SFX R   ு     ப்பார்க்கிறார்/y        .
SFX R   ு     ப்பார்க்கிறார்கள்/y         .
SFX R   ு     ப்பார்க்கிறது/y        .
SFX R   ு     ப்பார்க்கிறன/y       .
SFX R   ு     ப்பார்க்கின்றேன்/y       .
SFX R   ு     ப்பார்க்கின்றோம்/y       .
SFX R   ு     ப்பார்க்கின்றாய்/y         .
SFX R   ு     ப்பார்க்கின்றீர்/y         .
SFX R   ு     ப்பார்க்கின்றீர்கள்/y         .
SFX R   ு     ப்பார்க்கின்றான்/y         .
SFX R   ு     ப்பார்க்கின்றாள்/y        .
SFX R   ு     ப்பார்க்கின்றார்/y        .
SFX R   ு     ப்பார்க்கின்றார்கள்/y         .
SFX R   ு     ப்பார்க்கின்றது/y        .
SFX R   ு     ப்பார்க்கின்றன/y       .
SFX R   ு     ப்பார்ப்பேன்/y       .
SFX R   ு     ப்பார்ப்போம்/y       .
SFX R   ு     ப்பார்ப்பாய்/y         .
SFX R   ு     ப்பார்ப்பீர்/y         .
SFX R   ு     ப்பார்ப்பீர்கள்/y         .
SFX R   ு     ப்பார்ப்பான்/y         .
SFX R   ு     ப்பார்ப்பாள்/y        .
SFX R   ு     ப்பார்ப்பார்/y        .
SFX R   ு     ப்பார்ப்பார்கள்/y         .
SFX R   ு     ப்பார்க்கும்/y        .
SFX R   ு      வா/y       .
SFX R   ு      வந்தேன்/y       .
SFX R   ு      வந்தோம்/y       .
SFX R   ு      வந்தாய்/y         .
SFX R   ு      வந்தீர்/y         .
SFX R   ு      வந்தீர்கள்/y         .
SFX R   ு      வந்தான்/y         .
SFX R   ு      வந்தாள்/y         .
SFX R   ு      வந்தார்/y         .
SFX R   ு      வந்தார்கள்/y        .
SFX R   ு      வந்தது/y         .
SFX R   ு      வந்தன/y        .
SFX R   ு      வருகிறேன்/y       .
SFX R   ு      வருகிறோம்/y       .
SFX R   ு      வருகிறாய்/y         .
SFX R   ு      வருகிறீர்/y         .
SFX R   ு      வருகிறீர்கள்/y         .
SFX R   ு      வருகிறான்/y         .
SFX R   ு      வருகிறாள்/y        .
SFX R   ு      வருகிறார்/y        .
SFX R   ு      வருகிறார்கள்/y         .
SFX R   ு      வருகிறது/y        .
SFX R   ு      வருகிறன/y       .
SFX R   ு      வருகின்றேன்/y       .
SFX R   ு      வருகின்றோம்/y       .
SFX R   ு      வருகின்றாய்/y         .
SFX R   ு      வருகின்றீர்/y         .
SFX R   ு      வருகின்றீர்கள்/y         .
SFX R   ு      வருகின்றான்/y         .
SFX R   ு      வருகின்றாள்/y        .
SFX R   ு      வருகின்றார்/y        .
SFX R   ு      வருகின்றார்கள்/y         .
SFX R   ு      வருகின்றது/y        .
SFX R   ு      வருகின்றன/y       .
SFX R   ு      வருவேன்/y       .
SFX R   ு      வருவோம்/y       .
SFX R   ு      வருவாய்/y         .
SFX R   ு      வருவீர்/y         .
SFX R   ு      வருவீர்கள்/y         .
SFX R   ு      வருவான்/y         .
SFX R   ு      வருவாள்/y        .
SFX R   ு      வருவார்/y        .
SFX R   ு      வருவார்கள்/y         .
SFX R   ு      வரும்/y        .
SFX R   ு      ப்போ/y        .
SFX R   ு      ப்போனேன்/y       .
SFX R   ு      ப்போனோம்/y       .
SFX R   ு      ப்போனாய்/y         .
SFX R   ு      ப்போனீர்/y         .
SFX R   ு      ப்போனீர்கள்/y         .
SFX R   ு      ப்போனான்/y         .
SFX R   ு      ப்போனாள்/y         .
SFX R   ு      ப்போனார்/y         .
SFX R   ு      ப்போனார்கள்/y        .
SFX R   ு      ப்போனது/y         .
SFX R   ு      ப்போயிற்று/y         .
SFX R   ு      ப்போயின/y        .
SFX R   ு      ப்போகிறேன்/y       .
SFX R   ு      ப்போகிறோம்/y       .
SFX R   ு      ப்போகிறாய்/y         .
SFX R   ு      ப்போகிறீர்/y         .
SFX R   ு      ப்போகிறீர்கள்/y         .
SFX R   ு      ப்போகிறான்/y         .
SFX R   ு      ப்போகிறாள்/y        .
SFX R   ு      ப்போகிறார்/y        .
SFX R   ு      ப்போகிறார்கள்/y         .
SFX R   ு      ப்போகிறது/y        .
SFX R   ு      ப்போகிறன/y       .
SFX R   ு      ப்போகின்றேன்/y       .
SFX R   ு      ப்போகின்றோம்/y       .
SFX R   ு      ப்போகின்றாய்/y         .
SFX R   ு      ப்போகின்றீர்/y         .
SFX R   ு      ப்போகின்றீர்கள்/y         .
SFX R   ு      ப்போகின்றான்/y         .
SFX R   ு      ப்போகின்றாள்/y        .
SFX R   ு      ப்போகின்றார்/y        .
SFX R   ு      ப்போகின்றார்கள்/y         .
SFX R   ு      ப்போகின்றது/y        .
SFX R   ு      ப்போகின்றன/y       .
SFX R   ு      ப்போவேன்/y       .
SFX R   ு      ப்போவோம்/y       .
SFX R   ு      ப்போவாய்/y         .
SFX R   ு      ப்போவீர்/y         .
SFX R   ு      ப்போவீர்கள்/y         .
SFX R   ு      ப்போவான்/y         .
SFX R   ு      ப்போவாள்/y        .
SFX R   ு      ப்போவார்/y        .
SFX R   ு      ப்போவார்கள்/y         .
SFX R   ு      ப்போகும்/y        .
SFX R   ு      விரு/y        .
SFX R   ு      விருந்தேன்/y       .
SFX R   ு      விருந்தோம்/y       .
SFX R   ு      விருந்தாய்/y         .
SFX R   ு      விருந்தீர்/y         .
SFX R   ு      விருந்தீர்கள்/y         .
SFX R   ு      விருந்தான்/y         .
SFX R   ு      விருந்தாள்/y         .
SFX R   ு      விருந்தார்/y         .
SFX R   ு      விருந்தார்கள்/y        .
SFX R   ு      விருந்தது/y         .
SFX R   ு      விருந்தன/y        .
SFX R   ு      விருக்கிறேன்/y       .
SFX R   ு      விருக்கிறோம்/y       .
SFX R   ு      விருக்கிறாய்/y         .
SFX R   ு      விருக்கிறீர்/y         .
SFX R   ு      விருக்கிறீர்கள்/y         .
SFX R   ு      விருக்கிறான்/y         .
SFX R   ு      விருக்கிறாள்/y        .
SFX R   ு      விருக்கிறார்/y        .
SFX R   ு      விருக்கிறார்கள்/y         .
SFX R   ு      விருக்கிறது/y        .
SFX R   ு      விருக்கிறன/y       .
SFX R   ு      விருக்கின்றேன்/y       .
SFX R   ு      விருக்கின்றோம்/y       .
SFX R   ு      விருக்கின்றாய்/y         .
SFX R   ு      விருக்கின்றீர்/y         .
SFX R   ு      விருக்கின்றீர்கள்/y         .
SFX R   ு      விருக்கின்றான்/y         .
SFX R   ு      விருக்கின்றாள்/y        .
SFX R   ு      விருக்கின்றார்/y        .
SFX R   ு      விருக்கின்றார்கள்/y         .
SFX R   ு      விருக்கின்றது/y        .
SFX R   ு      விருக்கின்றன/y       .
SFX R   ு      விருப்பேன்/y       .
SFX R   ு      விருப்போம்/y       .
SFX R   ு      விருப்பாய்/y         .
SFX R   ு      விருப்பீர்/y         .
SFX R   ு      விருப்பீர்கள்/y         .
SFX R   ு      விருப்பான்/y         .
SFX R   ு      விருப்பாள்/y        .
SFX R   ு      விருப்பார்/y        .
SFX R   ு      விருப்பார்கள்/y         .
SFX R   ு      விருக்கும்/y        .
SFX R   ு      வேண்டியிரு/y        .
SFX R   ு      வேண்டியிருந்தேன்/y       .
SFX R   ு      வேண்டியிருந்தோம்/y       .
SFX R   ு      வேண்டியிருந்தாய்/y         .
SFX R   ு      வேண்டியிருந்தீர்/y         .
SFX R   ு      வேண்டியிருந்தீர்கள்/y         .
SFX R   ு      வேண்டியிருந்தான்/y         .
SFX R   ு      வேண்டியிருந்தாள்/y         .
SFX R   ு      வேண்டியிருந்தார்/y         .
SFX R   ு      வேண்டியிருந்தார்கள்/y        .
SFX R   ு      வேண்டியிருந்தது/y         .
SFX R   ு      வேண்டியிருந்தன/y        .
SFX R   ு      வேண்டியிருக்கிறேன்/y       .
SFX R   ு      வேண்டியிருக்கிறோம்/y       .
SFX R   ு      வேண்டியிருக்கிறாய்/y         .
SFX R   ு      வேண்டியிருக்கிறீர்/y         .
SFX R   ு      வேண்டியிருக்கிறீர்கள்/y         .
SFX R   ு      வேண்டியிருக்கிறான்/y         .
SFX R   ு      வேண்டியிருக்கிறாள்/y        .
SFX R   ு      வேண்டியிருக்கிறார்/y        .
SFX R   ு      வேண்டியிருக்கிறார்கள்/y         .
SFX R   ு      வேண்டியிருக்கிறது/y        .
SFX R   ு      வேண்டியிருக்கிறன/y       .
SFX R   ு      வேண்டியிருக்கின்றேன்/y       .
SFX R   ு      வேண்டியிருக்கின்றோம்/y       .
SFX R   ு      வேண்டியிருக்கின்றாய்/y         .
SFX R   ு      வேண்டியிருக்கின்றீர்/y         .
SFX R   ு      வேண்டியிருக்கின்றீர்கள்/y         .
SFX R   ு      வேண்டியிருக்கின்றான்/y         .
SFX R   ு      வேண்டியிருக்கின்றாள்/y        .
SFX R   ு      வேண்டியிருக்கின்றார்/y        .
SFX R   ு      வேண்டியிருக்கின்றார்கள்/y         .
SFX R   ு      வேண்டியிருக்கின்றது/y        .
SFX R   ு      வேண்டியிருக்கின்றன/y       .
SFX R   ு      வேண்டியிருப்பேன்/y       .
SFX R   ு      வேண்டியிருப்போம்/y       .
SFX R   ு      வேண்டியிருப்பாய்/y         .
SFX R   ு      வேண்டியிருப்பீர்/y         .
SFX R   ு      வேண்டியிருப்பீர்கள்/y         .
SFX R   ு      வேண்டியிருப்பான்/y         .
SFX R   ு      வேண்டியிருப்பாள்/y        .
SFX R   ு      வேண்டியிருப்பார்/y        .
SFX R   ு      வேண்டியிருப்பார்கள்/y         .
SFX R   ு      வேண்டியிருக்கும்/y        .
